src/fst/morphology/affixes/noun_to_verb.lexc
LEXICON liri_iv
< "@U.liri.ON@" > XIi_voqXmorf ;

LEXICON lirsur_iv
< "@C.Num@" "@U.lirsur.ON@" > IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ;

LEXICON lirsur_tv
< "@C.Num@" "@U.lirsur.ON@" > TV_UTE_gennemgang ;

LEXICON liur_iv
< "@C.Num@" > IV_r_stem ;

LEXICON liuup_tv
< "@C.Num@" "@U.saar.OFF@" > HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;

LEXICON lup_nv
< "@U.lup.ON@" > IV_k_stem ;

LEXICON nar_tv
< "@U.Boole.On@" > IV_r ;

LEXICON nga_nv
< "@U.utevn.OFF@" "@U.nganv.ON@" > IV_voq ;

LEXICON nngir_nv 
< "@U.umi.OFF@" "@U.nngir.ON@" > XIirXmorf_stem ;

LEXICON nngur_tv ! +NNGUR+Der/nv
< "@C.Num@" "@U.qe.OFF@" "@U.alup.OFF@" "@U.nip.ON@" "@U.nngur.ON@" > HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
!malinnaavinnguineqarlutik

LEXICON nngur_iv
< "@C.Num@" "@U.nngur.ON@" > IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ;

LEXICON nip_iv ! +NIP+Der/nv
< "@U.qe.OFF@" "@U.alup.OFF@" "@U.nip.ON@" > IV_k ;
!malinnaaffinialugit
!tunngavilersuutineqineqarneri

LEXICON qar_nv
< "@C.Num@" "@U.nar.OFF@" "@U.nga.OFF@" "@U.usar.OFF@" > IV_r_stem ;

LEXICON si_nv 
< "@U.ja.OFF@" "@U.sinv.ON@" > XIi_voqXmorf ;

LEXICON tu_iv ! +TU+Der/nv
< "@U.tu.ON@" > IV_voq_stem ;

LEXICON tur_iv
< "@C.Num@" "@U.tur.ON@" > IV_r_stem ;
